src/fst/stems/nouns.lexc
LEXICON NounRoot !!≈ * **@CODE@**
vaaramaa:vaara#maa n0 ;
poikkimaa:poikki#maa n0 ;
pissihaukammaa:pissihaukam#maa n0 ;
ketomaa:keto#maa n0 ;
pottumaa:pottu#maa n0 ;
laihaliha:laihaliha n1 ;
pokkalihat:pokkaliha n1_pl ;
kaalsuhat:kaalsuha n1_pl ;
noutajat:noutaja n1_pl ;
jumalallahja:jumalallahja n1 ;
kellonviljat:kellonvilja n1_pl ;
mettävvilja:mettävvilja n1 ;
vittapaaka:vittapaaka n1 ;
leuhka:leuhka n1 ;
heinänaika:heinän#aika n1 ;
ketunpoika:ketun#poika n1 ;
maapaikka:maa#paikka nx ;
järvipilkka:järvipilkka nx ;
korvahaukka:korva#haukka nx ;
töppöjalka:töppöjalka nx ;
paska:paska nx ;
kirjanniskat:kirjan#niska n1_pl ;
sekakala:sekakala nx ;
laskiaispulla:laskiaispulla nx ;
kupula:kupula nx ;
tiima:tiima n1 ;
valmat:valma n1_pl ;
kahenhengenilma:kahenhengenilma nx ;
lakana:lakana nx ;
noppa:noppa nx ;
vaarat:vaara n1_pl ;
valtaherra:valtaherra nx ;
kirkonaita:kirkonaita nx ;
neljäskunta:neljäs#kunta n1 ;
luminaatta:luminaatta nx ;
pikkukartat:pikku#kartta n1_pl ;
juova:juo#va nx ;
vuohikarvat:vuohi#karva n1_pl ;
ketunrauvat:ketun#rauva n1_pl ;
romani% chib:romani% chib nc ;
nuhe:nuhe n2 ;
tähe:tähe n2 ;
tie:tie n0 ;
lehmitie:lehmi#tie n0 ;
kulkutie:kulku#tie n0 ;
mattokaije:matto#kaije n2 ;
lae:lake n2 ;
vehkheet:vehk2e n2_pl ;
hevosvehkheet:hevos#vehk2e n2_pl ;
vuolake:vuolakke n2 ;
ilmanveike:ilman#veikke n2 ;
välke:välkke n2 ;
miellyke:miellykke n2 ;
palkheet:palk2e n2_pl ;
poljinpalkheet:poljin#palk2e n2_pl ;
tankopalkheet:tanko#palk2e n2_pl ;
hylje:hylke n2 ;
vyölänget:vyö#länke n1_pl ;
paakale:paakale n2 ;
kapale:kapale n2 ;
näytöskappale:näytös#kappale n2 ;
vesikirpalheet:vesi#kirpale n2_pl ;
kronele:kronele n2 ;
valtanöyle:valtanöyle n2 ;
töhmäle:töhmäle n2 ;
ime:ime n2 ;
lapakäärme:lapakäärme n2 ;
kipenheet:kip2ene n2_pl ;
kakslaitavene:kakslaitavene n2 ;
puuvene:puuvene n2 ;
kahnheet:kahne n2_pl ;
kirjotusainheet:kirjotus#aine n2_pl ;
jalkine:jalkine n2 ;
lentokone:lentokone n2 ;
pirttihuone:pirtti#huone n2 ;
kampheet:kamp2e n2_pl ;
lumme:lumpe n2 ;
varpheet:varp2e n2_pl ;
keskivarpheet:keski#varp2e n2_pl ;
nenävarpheet:nenä#varp2e n2_pl ;
hypheet:hyp2e n2_pl ;
utarheet:utare n2_pl ;
piire:piire n2 ;
mätäpaise:mätäpaise n2 ;
liisheet:liise n2_pl ;
potaatiliisheet:potaati#liise n2_pl ;
koppelonpisheet:koppelon#pise n2_pl ;
kaatheet:kaat2e n2_pl ;
vaatheet:vaat2e n2_pl ;
matkavaatheet:matka#vaat2e n2_pl ;
vuoevaatheet:vuoe#vaat2e n2_pl ;
jahtivaatheet:jahti#vaat2e n2_pl ;
kuolinvaatheet:kuolin#vaat2e n2_pl ;
alusvaatheet:alus#vaat2e n2_pl ;
pyhävaatheet:pyhä#vaat2e n2_pl ;
mantusae:mantu#sate n2 ;
kaste:kaste n2 ;
listheet:liste n2_pl ;
kleninkivaate:kleninki#vaatte n2 ;
laite:laitte n2 ;
hautheet:haut2e n2_pl ;
hytheet:hyt2e n2_pl ;
matonkue:maton#kue n2 ;
kattoturve:katto#turve n2 ;
tongit:tongi n1_pl ;
ääripiit:ääri#pii n0_pl ;
raji:raji nx ;
lihapukit:liha#pukki n1_pl ;
ohrankryynisäkki:ohrankryyni#säkki nx ;
meteli:meteli nx ;
viisymmi:viisymmi nx ;
materi:materi nx ;
rastikyyri:rastikyyri nx ;
piimävesit:piimä#vesi n1_pl ;
putaati:putaati nx ;
posetiivit:posetiivi n1_pl ;
kväi:kväi n0 ;
evankeeljum:evankeeljum nc ; !CHECK!
muho:muho n1 ;
piot:pio n1_pl ;
riikinjako:riikinjako n1 ;
liehakko:liehakko n1 ;
laiskakekko:laiskakekko n1 ;
koikko:koikko n1 ;
unikokko:unikokko n1 ;
peräloukko:peräloukko n1 ;
katisko:katisko n1 ;
jeelo:jeelo n1 ;
norjanpallo:norjanpallo n1 ;
kotiolot:koti#olo n1_pl ;
ponkamo:ponkamo n1 ;
pino:pino n1 ;
kivikaro:kivikaro n1 ;
lahtiporo:lahtiporo n1 ;
patapeso:patapeso n1 ;
keto:keto n1 ;
kolikkohoito:kolikkohoito n1 ;
tunto:tunto n1 ;
laskiaisaatto:laskiaisaatto n1 ;
litto:litto n1 ;
läpihuuot:läpihuuo n1_pl ;
tasanurkkasalvo:tasanurkkasalvo n1 ;
kaulaneuvot:kaulaneuvo n1_pl ;
kengitysneuvot:kengitysneuvo n1_pl ;
kivitaut:kivitau n1_pl ;
vaivaiskoiju:vaivaiskoiju nx ;
vattatakut:vattatakku n1_pl ;
urut:urku n1_pl ;
vaskikalu:vaskikalu nx ;
kulut:kulu n1_pl ;
kiertotraput:kiertotrappu n1_pl ;
pissahoppu:pissahoppu nx ;
paatihousut:paati#housu n1_pl ;
vuosihousut:vuosihousu n1_pl ;
tnturikettu:tnturikettu nx ;
kuivitusvanthuut:kuivitusvanthuu n1_pl ;
täysikuu:täysi#kuu n0 ;
syänkuut:syän#kuu n0_pl ;
pakkaskuut:pakkas#kuu n0_pl ;
syyskuu:syys#kuu n0 ;
köyrykuut:köyry#kuu n0_pl ;
kesäkuut:kesä#kuu n0_pl ;
kurttaluu:kurtta#luu n0 ;
kommoluu:kommo#luu n0 ;
kalloluut:kalloluu n0_pl ;
puut:puu n0_pl ;
pakkapuu:pakka#puu n0 ;
luomapuut:luoma#puu n0_pl ;
tolppapuu:tolppa#puu n0 ;
venepuu:vene#puu n0 ;
suksipuu:suksi#puu n0 ;
karopuu:karo#puu n0 ;
kaulauspuut:kaulaus#puu n0_pl ;
jaluspuu:jalus#puu n0 ;
räkäpuu:räkä#puu n0 ;
vanutuspuut:vanutuspuu n0_pl ;
teränsuu:terän#suu n0 ;
niitty:niitty nx ;
valmarreikä:valmarreikä nx ;
ruojuskengät:ruojus#kenkä n1_pl ;
tuhrusilmä:tuhrusilmä nx ;
yöheinät:yö#heinä n1_pl ;
leväperä:leväperä nx ;
killenpojanpäivät:killenpojanpäivä n1_pl ;
laskiaispäivä:laskiaispäivä nx ;
rituratujää:rituratu#jää n0 ;
osapää:osa#pää n0 ;
välipää:väli#pää n0 ;
poskenpää:posken#pää n0 ;
jauhopää:jauho#pää n0 ;
kiukkupää:kiukku#pää n0 ;
poutasää:pouta#sää n0 ;
ryyppö:ryyppö n1 ;
kylmäsyö:kylmäs#yö n0 ;
knyppäystyö:knyppäys#työ n0 ;
mäkivyöt:mäki#vyö n0_pl ;
veätysvyö:veätys#vyö n0 ;
covid-19 n_nomorph ;
kuolheet:kuole n2_pl ;
